Illinois, session 104th, HB3793.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Natural Areas Stewardship Act is 5amended by adding Section 25.1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 31/25.1 new)7    Sec. 25.1. Notification to persons who reside in 8Conservation Opportunity Areas.9    (a) In this Section, "Conservation Opportunity Area" means 10an area identified in the Illinois Wildlife Action Plan where 11ecological and social conditions align to provide 12opportunities for stewardship and recovery of species of 13greatest conservation need and their habitats as determined by 14the Department.15    (b) The Department shall notify all persons residing in a 16Conservation Opportunity Area that they reside in a 17Conservation Opportunity Area. The Department shall send one 18notice per household. The Department shall determine the 19content of the notice and the manner of notification.